pl: Potencjalne wyodrębnienie: Wysoki; Niski; Środek; Inne
ro-RO: Extract potențial: Ridicat; Redus; Mediu; Altele
da: Potentielt udtræk: Høj; Lav; Medium; Andet
nl: Potentieel extract: Hoog; Laag; Medium; Andere
bg-BG: Потенциален екстракт: Висок; Нисък; Среден; Други
lt-LT: Ekstrakto stiprumas: Stiprus; Silpnas; Vidutinis; Kita
ja: 潜在的抽出物: 高; 低; 媒体; その他
sv: Potentiellt extrakt: Hög; Låg; Medium; Övrigt
ko: 추출량: 높음; 낮음; 매체; 기타
el: Πιθανό εκχύλισμα: Υψηλή; Χαμηλή; Μέση; Άλλο
ru: Потенциальная экстрактивность: Высокий; Низкий; Средний; Другой
tr: Potansiyel Ekstrakt: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Diğer
zh-CN: 潜在提取物: 高; 低; 媒介; 其他
es: Extracto potencial: Alto; Bajo; Medio; Otros
pt-BR: Potencial do extrato: Alta; Baixa; Médio; Outro
hu: Potenciális kivonat: Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Egyéb
cs: Sladový výtažek: Vysoký; Nízký; Médium; Jiné
sk-SK: Potenciálny extrakt: Vysoký; Nízky; Stredný; Iné
pt-PT: Potencial de extração: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Outro
hr-HR: Potencijalna količina ekstrakta: Visoki; Niski; Srednji; Ostalo
en: Potential extract: High; Low; Medium; Other
fr: Extrait potentiel: Haute; Basse; Moyen; Autre
vi: Chiết xuất tiềm năng: Cao; Trễ; Vừa; Khác
sl-SI: Potencialni izvleček: Visok; Nizek; Srednji; Drugo
fi: Potentiaalinen uute: Korkea; Matala; Keskimääräinen; Muu
nb: Potensiell ekstrakt: Høy; Lav; Middels; Annet
de: Potenzieller Extrakt: Hoch; Niedrig; Medium; Sonstiges
it: Estratto potenziale: Alto; Basso; Medio; Altro
th: สารสกัดที่มีศักยภาพ: เอวสูง; ต่ำ; สื่อ; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 潛在萃取精華: 高; 低; 媒介; 其他